North Dakota, session 69, HB1480.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 39-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Request for certificate of title - Nonlegal owner.
1. If a motor vehicle, which has been issued a certificate of title, has not been registered
under chapter 39 - 04 for more than twenty - five years, and an individual, who is not the
legal owner, requests a certificate of title, the individual requesting the certificate of title
shall:
a. Send a certified letter to the last-known address at which the motor vehicle was
registered.
b. Advertise twice over a thirty - day period a notice of the vehicle title request in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the vehicle was last
registered.
2. If the individual requesting the certificate of title does not receive a response within
thirty days and provides the department with satisfactory proof of compliance with this
section, the department shall issue a certificate of title to the individual under section
39 - 05 - 09 .
Page No. 1 25.0839.02000